Utah statutes.
19-6-1204.   Public education program.

(1)  Effective January 1, 2012, a manufacturer may not offer a consumer electronic device for sale in the state unless the manufacturer individually, through a group manufacturer organization, or through the manufacturer's industry trade group establishes and implements, in accordance with Subsection (2), a public education program regarding the eligible programs.

(2) (a)  The public education program required under Subsection (1) shall:

(i)  inform a consumer about eligible programs; and

(ii)  use manufacturer-developed customer outreach materials, such as packaging inserts, company websites, and other communication methods, to inform a consumer about eligible programs.

(b)  A manufacturer described in Subsection (1) shall work with the department and other interested parties to develop educational materials that inform consumers about an eligible program.



Enacted by Chapter 213, 2011 General Session

